Hawaii, session 2025, SB1599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a significant number of government positions are funded but currently vacant and have remained so for multiple years.  The purpose of this bill is to eliminate wasteful spending by requiring the abolishment of public employment positions that have been vacant for six years if the hiring department or agency has not certified that they are awaiting approval to hire for that position. SECTION 2.  Section 26-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The department of human resources development shall be headed by a single executive to be known as the director of human resources development.  The director shall: (1)  Facilitate and expedite the hiring and recruitment for civil service positions under the jurisdiction of the department of human resources development; and (2)  Have the authority to reclassify and abolish vacant positions within state departments and agencies that are under the jurisdiction of the department of human resources development, subject to the following conditions: (A)  [Prior to] Except as provided in subparagraph (c); before reclassifying or abolishing any vacant position as provided under this paragraph, the director shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to each regular session[.  The report shall include a list of vacant positions for reclassification or abolishment, identify the agency each position is attached to, provide reasons for reclassifying or abolishing the position, and state the duration that the position has been vacant; and]; (B)  The director may reclassify or abolish any vacant position as provided under this paragraph no earlier than sixty days after the report has been submitted to the legislature as provided under subparagraph (A)[.]; (C)  The director shall abolish any position that has been vacant for more than five years; provided that the time a position has been vacant shall be computed beginning on the date the position was created or vacated by a state employee; provided further that this requirement shall not apply to positions for which the hiring department or agency certifies that it is awaiting approval to hire.  Funds for positions abolished under this subparagraph shall immediately lapse to the credit of the general fund; and (D)  The report required to be submitted to the legislature pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include: (i)  A list of vacant positions that will be reclassified or abolished, the agency each position is attached to, the duration that the position has been vacant, and the reasons for the reclassification or abolishment; and (ii)  A list of positions abolished pursuant to subparagraph (C)." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________